Massachusetts, session 194th, S147.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Subsection (B) of Section 2 of chapter 18 of the General Laws, as so appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended after line 172 by inserting the following new
paragraph:-
(t). promptly replace the full amount of financial assistance or nutrition benefits stolen
through electronic benefit transfer card skimming, card cloning or other fraudulent methods,
including organized identity theft schemes, to the extent the federal government fails to provide
federal funds to replace stolen benefits, provided that the thefts have been reported to or
identified by the Department in accordance with procedures for making and verifying
replacement claims established by the department.
of 1